Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB143.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "sexually exploited child" in section 3001 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3001. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Sexually exploited child." An individual under 18 years of age who:123456789101112131415161718192021 (1) is a victim of sexual servitude; [or](2) is a victim of [an offense under 18 U.S.C. § 1591 (relating to sex trafficking of children or by force, fraud, or coercion).] human trafficking; or(3) is determined to have engaged or attempted to engage in prostitution as described under section 5902(a) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).* * *Section 2. Section 3019(a) of Title 18 is amended to read:§ 3019. Victim protection during prosecution.(a) Disclosure of name [of victim of human trafficking] prohibited.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, unless the court otherwise orders in a prosecution involving a victim of human trafficking or a sexually exploited child, an officer or employee of the court may not disclose the identity of the victim of human trafficking or the sexually exploited child to the public. Any record revealing the name of the victim of human trafficking or the sexually exploited child shall not be open to public inspection.* * *Section 3. Section 3065(a), (b) and (c) of Title 18 are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:§ 3065. Safe harbor for sexually exploited children.[(a) Safe harbor.--If it is determined by a law enforcement officer, after reasonable detention for investigative purposes, that an individual is under 18 years of age and is determined to be a sexually exploited child as defined in section 3001 (relating to definitions), the individual shall be immune from:(1) Prosecution or adjudication as a delinquent child 20250SB0143PN0088 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for a violation of sections 5507 (relating to obstructing highways and other public passages) and 5902(a) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).(2) Revocation of an existing term of probation or parole arising from a conviction or adjudication for another offense if the revocation is based on conduct under paragraph (1).](a.1) Contact and assessment.--(1) After reasonable detention for investigative purposes, if a law enforcement officer suspects that a child may be a sexually exploited child as defined under section 3001 (relating to definitions), the law enforcement officer shall immediately notify a county agency.(2) After receipt of a notification from a law enforcement officer of a suspected sexually exploited child under this subsection, the county agency or an entity contracted by the county agency to conduct child abuse and neglect determinations shall immediately contact the child and, in coordination with law enforcement, conduct an assessment to determine whether:(i) the child is a sexually exploited child; and(ii) the child's actions were a direct result of the child being a sexually exploited child.(3) An assessment conducted under paragraph (2) may be conducted using a screening tool that ascertains:(i) The child's current conditions and the child's history of sex or labor trafficking.(ii) Any past reports of sex or labor trafficking involving the child.(iii) Any current or past reports of sexual abuse 20250SB0143PN0088 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 involving the child.(iv) Any current or past incidents of inappropriate sexual behaviors involving the child.(v) Whether the child is known to associate with confirmed or suspected sexually exploited children.(a.2) Safe harbor response following assessment.--If, after an assessment conducted under subsection (a.1), it is determined by a law enforcement officer in consultation with a county agency or an entity contracted by the county agency that the child is a sexually exploited child and, if the child was suspected of committing an offense, the child's actions were the direct result of the child being a sexually exploited child or the child was suspected of engaging in prostitution, the child shall be immune from:(1) Arrest, charges and prosecution or adjudication as a delinquent child for a violation of an offense that was committed as a direct result of the child being a sexually exploited child.(2) Revocation of an existing term of probation or parole arising from a conviction or adjudication for another offense if the revocation is based on conduct under paragraph (1).(b) Exceptions to safe harbor.--The safe harbor under subsection [(a)] (a.2) shall not:(1) Interfere with or prevent an investigation, arrest, charge, prosecution, delinquency adjudication or revocation for violations other than a violation under subsection [(a)] (a.2).(2) Bar the admission of evidence in connection with the investigation and prosecution for a violation other than a 20250SB0143PN0088 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violation under subsection [(a)] (a.2).(3) Bar the admission of evidence in connection with an investigation and prosecution of an individual who does not qualify for safe harbor as provided under this section.(c) Detainment.--[An individual] A child determined to be a sexually exploited child as defined in section 3001 [(relating to definitions)] shall be detained no longer than necessary [and only to] to assess the child and assist the child in securing specialized services available under section 3062 (relating to specialized services for sexually exploited children) or to refer the child to a county agency [if required] under 42 Pa.C.S. § 6328 (relating to dependency in lieu of delinquency).* * *(e) Determination during proceedings.--At any time after a petition alleging delinquency under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters) has been filed alleging that the child has committed an offense, the court, on its own motion, on the motion of the child's counsel or the district attorney, shall:(1) Stay all proceedings until the determination under paragraph (3) is made.(2) Schedule a hearing within 15 days of the motion being filed or, on good cause shown, longer.(3) Determine, by evidence presented on the record and by a preponderance of the evidence, if:(i) the child is a sexually exploited child; and(ii) the alleged acts in the petition were committed as a direct result of the child being a sexually exploited child. The action of engaging or attempting to engage in prostitution shall be deemed the direct result of the child being a sexually exploited child.20250SB0143PN0088 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) If the court finds that the child meets the criteria in paragraph (3):(i) dismiss the petition;(ii) order the child discharged from any detention or other restriction ordered in the proceeding; and(iii) refer the child to a county agency under 23 Pa.C.S. §§ 6362 (relating to responsibilities of county agency for child protective services) and 6375 (relating to county agency requirements for general protective services) for specialized services under section 3062.Section 4. Section 5702 heading and subsection (c) of Title 23 are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5702. County and department responsibilities.* * *(c) Report to department.--[The county agency shall report annually to the department the total number of children who are sex trafficking victims. The report shall be submitted in the form and by the deadline prescribed by the department.] A county agency shall report annually to the department the following information in the form and by the deadline prescribed by the department:(1) The total number of children who are sex trafficking victims.(2) The total number of children who have been reported missing under subsection (b) and whether or not the child has been subsequently located.(3) The total number of children who have been identified, screened and assessed as possible sex trafficking victims by the county agency.20250SB0143PN0088 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Department responsibilities.--The department shall report annually the information received from a county agency under subsection (c) to the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Aging and Youth Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Children and Youth Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 5. Section 5703 of Title 23 is amended to read:§ 5703. Law enforcement responsibilities.When law enforcement receives information from a county agency about a child who is missing from the child's residence or is abducted under section 5702(b) (relating to county and department responsibilities), law enforcement shall enter the information into the National Crime Information Center database.Section 6. Section 6328 of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 6328. Dependency in lieu of delinquency.(a) Referral to county agency.--[The offenses provided under subsection (b)] Any offense determined by a law enforcement officer under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3065(a.2) (relating to safe harbor for sexually exploited children) or the court under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3065(e) to be committed by a child as a direct result of being a sexually exploited child as defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001 (relating to definitions) shall be referred to a county agency under 23 Pa.C.S. §§ 6362 (relating to responsibilities of county agency for child protective services) and 6375 (relating to county agency requirements for general protective services) [if 20250SB0143PN0088 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the offense:(1) Is committed by a child as a direct result of being a sexually exploited child as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001 (relating to definitions).(2) Is directly related to having been subject to human trafficking as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3001.] for specialized services under 18 Pa.C.S. § 3062 (relating to specialized services for sexually exploited children).[(b) Eligible offenses.--Eligible offenses for referral to a county agency include the following:(1) 18 Pa.C.S. § 3503 (relating to criminal trespass).(2) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4914 (relating to false identification to law enforcement authorities).(3) 18 Pa.C.S. § 5503 (relating to disorderly conduct).(4) 18 Pa.C.S. § 5506 (relating to loitering and prowling at night time).(5) An offense for simple possession of a controlled substance under section 13(a)(16) and (31) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.](c) Delinquency proceedings.--[(1)] If an offense [listed in subsection (b)] is referred to a county agency under subsection (a), delinquency proceedings under this chapter may not be commenced [immediately].[(2) If treatment and social services are unsuccessful while the dependency petition is pending, as evidenced by the child's behavior, and the county agency believes that juvenile justice services are necessary and warranted, the county agency shall refer the child's case to the juvenile 20250SB0143PN0088 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 probation department or district attorney's office for the commencement of delinquency proceedings.](d) Record expungement.--Upon the final discharge of supervision, juvenile court records relating to an offense [listed in subsection (b)] referred to a county agency under subsection (a) shall be expunged by the court under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9123 (relating to juvenile records).Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0143PN0088 - 9 - 12345678